Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1391
Exterior access roads; interior service
roads; plans; reviewed annually; report; contents.

The Game
and Parks Commission shall develop and file with the Governor and the Legislature
a one-year plan and a long-range five-year plan of proposed construction and
improvements for all exterior access roads and interior service roads as provided
in section 39-1390, based on priority of needs and calculated to contribute
to the orderly development of an integrated system of roads with the facilities
maintained or managed by the Game and Parks Commission. The first such plan
shall be filed on or before January 1, 1974. The plans shall be reviewed and
extended annually, on or before January 1 of each year, so that there shall
always be a current one-year and five-year plan on file. The plans submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. All plans shall specify the criteria employed
in setting the priorities and shall also identify any additional recreation
road requirements which may exist but are not reflected in the one-year and
five-year plans. The commission shall also, at the time it files such plans
and extensions thereof, report the construction and improvements certified
during each of the two immediately preceding calendar years.

Laws 1973, LB 374, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 41.